Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB346.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protecting Pennsylvania's Public Investments from Geopolitical Risk Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Foreign country." A sovereign nation other than the United States."Fund manager." The entity that manages a public fund."Geopolitical risks." The market risks to investments that result from geopolitical events, including risks due to war, terrorist attacks and other actions that impact the normal and 1234567891011121314151617 peaceful course of international relations."Public fund." As defined in section 2 of the act of July 2, 2010 (P.L.266, No.44), known as the Protecting Pennsylvania's Investments Act.Section 3. Consideration of geopolitical risks.(a) Considerations for public funds.--A fund manager shall consider geopolitical risks within the investment decision process for a public fund for the following:(1) Making an investment in an asset that is domiciled in a foreign country where geopolitical risks are present.(2) Making an investment in an asset that has a substantial economic connection to a foreign country where geopolitical risks are present, in accordance with the investment policy under subsection (c).(b) Coordination with other responsibilities.--The considerations under subsection (a) shall be made in coordination with, and subject to, any other actions taken as part of the public fund's compliance with any other fiduciary or prudent investing responsibilities as prescribed under:(1) The act of July 2, 2010 (P.L.266, No.44) known as the Protecting Pennsylvania's Investments Act.(2) The act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.1970, No.132), known as the Russia and Belarus Divestiture Act.(3) 24 Pa.C.S. § 8521 (relating to management of fund and accounts).(4) 71 Pa.C.S. § 5931 (relating to management of fund and accounts).(5) Any obligations of a public fund with respect to the choice of any of the following:(i) Asset managers.20250HB0346PN0301 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Investment funds.(iii) Investments for the public fund's securities portfolios.(c) Investment policy.--A fund manager shall adopt an investment policy that establishes criteria to determine whether an asset has a substantial economic connection to a foreign country under subsection (a)(2). Criteria under this subsection may include a review of the risks to supply chains in foreign countries and the proportion of assets received from a foreign country.Section 4. Annual report.(a) Annual report.--No later than December 31, 2025, and each December 31 thereafter, a fund manager shall publish an annual report that contains a list of the public fund's investments that are domiciled in foreign countries as of the prior June 30.(b) Publication and distribution.--The report under subsection (a) shall be published on the public fund's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0346PN0301 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021